Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.020

Jurisdiction acquired, when.

From the time of the commencement of the action by service of summons, or by the filing of a complaint, or as otherwise provided, the court is deemed to have acquired jurisdiction and to have control of all subsequent proceedings.

[ 1984 c 76 s 2; 1895 c 86 s 4; 1893 c 127 s 15; RRS s 238.]